New Jersey, session 222, S258.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)    a.   As used in this section: "Business day" means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday or State or federal holiday. "Health care facility" means a health care facility licensed by the Department of Health  pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), a psychiatric hospital operated by the Department of Human Services and listed in R.S.30:1-7, or any similar facility licensed by and operating in another state. "Public housing for seniors" means low-income, subsidized housing for individuals 55 years of age and older. "Senior citizen" means a person 62 years of age or over and shall include a surviving spouse if that surviving spouse is 55 years of age or over. b.    Upon receipt of written proof that a senior citizen residing in public housing for seniors was admitted to a health care facility, a landlord shall waive any late charge incurred by the tenant during the period of hospitalization and the grace period of five business days following discharge.  If payment of rent is not remitted within five business days following discharge, any late charge permitted under law may be imposed upon the senior citizen. The grace period of five business days shall not commence following discharge from a health care facility if the senior citizen is admitted to a subsequent health care facility and does not return to the rental premises following discharge from the prior health care facility, provided that a tenant shall remain responsible for any rent which is due or may become due before the lease expires or is terminated pursuant to the provisions of the lease agreement or State law. c.     A person violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to a fine of $100 for a first offense, a fine of $250 for a second offense, and a fine of $500 for a third or subsequent offense.  The action shall be brought by the Attorney General in a summary proceeding pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). 2.    Section 3 of P.L.1976, c.100 (C.2A:42-6.3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    The provisions of [this act] section 1 of P.L.1976, c.100 (C.2A:42-6.1) shall only be applicable to premises rented or leased by senior citizens receiving Social Security Old Age Pensions, Railroad Retirement Pensions or other governmental pensions in lieu of Social Security Old Age Pensions, and by recipients of Social Security Disability Benefits, Supplemental Security Income or benefits under Work First New Jersey. (cf: P.L.2001, c.142, s.2) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.